Tennessee, session 114, HB2434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3803(d), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (d)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision:
(2) A policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (d)(1) must not allow for the
removal of a material in a library collection that is being evaluated by the local board of
education or public charter school governing body pursuant to subsection (e) or by the
state textbook and instructional materials quality commission pursuant to § 49-6-
2201(m)(1)(D) until a determination is made by the local board, governing body, or
commission, as applicable, to remove the material from the library collection.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3803(e), is amended by
deleting "subdivision (d)(2)" and substituting "subdivision (d)(1)(B)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2434
012149
- 1 -